Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.661

Conservator serves until purposes are accomplished.

The conservator shall serve until the purposes of the conservatorship have been accomplished. If rehabilitated, the credit union must be returned to management or new management under such conditions as the director may determine.

[ 1997 c 397 s 67.]